Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.020

Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of fish and fishery products through cooperation; to eliminate speculation and waste; to make the distribution of fish and fishery products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done; and to stabilize the marketing of fish and fishery products.

[ 1959 c 312 s 2.]